Vermont statutes. Title 12 Court Procedure
Subchapter 2. Personal Property, Levy, and Sale

§ 2731.
Levy on personal property.

When the execution with costs is not paid on demand the officer shall levy the same upon the goods or chattels of the debtor or such as are shown him or her by the creditor, and the same shall be safely kept by the officer at the debtor’s expense, until sold or the execution is otherwise satisfied.

§ 2732.
Goods, effects, and credits held by third person.

On request of the judgment creditor, the clerk of the court granting judgment shall issue to the officer holding the execution a summons as trustee to a third person having in his or her hands goods, effects, or credits, other than earnings, of the debtor that have not previously been attached on trustee process in connection with the action.
The summons shall be in such form as the Supreme Court may by rule provide for a summons to a trustee in connection with the commencement of an action and shall state the date and amount of the judgment. The summons shall be served by the officer upon the trustee in like manner and with the same effect as mesne process.
A copy of the summons shall be served upon the judgment debtor with the officer’s endorsement thereon of the date of service upon the trustee.
After service of the summons, proceedings shall be had as provided by law and by rule promulgated by the Supreme Court for trustee process in connection with the commencement of an action.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 235, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 2733.
Advertisement.

The officer shall forthwith advertise the goods or chattels so taken by posting at a public place in the town where they were taken a notice enumerating them and stating the time when the same will be sold at public auction at such public place, which time shall not be less than 14 days from the time of posting such notice. If the amount of the execution is $50.00 or more and if the cost of publication does not exceed $2.00, such notice shall also be published two weeks successively prior to such sale in at least one newspaper published in such town, if there are any published therein, and, if not, in a newspaper of known circulation in such town.

When the property levied upon is hay, grain in the straw, potatoes, timber, lumber, brick, lime, coal, charcoal, ashes, machinery used in a shop, mill or factory, hides in the process of tanning, cordwood, stone, ore, bark, shingles, hives of bees, hay scales, or the utensils and apparatus kept on a farm for the manufacture of maple sugar, the notice shall state the time when the same will be sold, either at the place where the same are kept by the officer or at such public place.

§ 2734.
Sale.

When the debtor does not satisfy the execution with costs and charges thereon before the time of sale, the officer shall, at the time and place appointed, sell the same, or a part thereof sufficient to satisfy the execution with the costs and charges thereon, at public auction to the highest bidder.

§ 2735.
Application of proceeds.

The monies arising from such sales shall be applied to the payment of the charges and the satisfaction of the execution. The officer shall pay on demand the residue, if any, to the debtor.

§ 2736.
Penalty for not paying to creditor.

An officer who, on demand, does not pay to the creditor in an execution, his or her agent or attorney, such sums of money as he or she receives on the execution, shall forfeit to the person to whose use he or she received the same, 15 percent interest thereon, so long as he or she detains it after demand, to be recovered in an action of tort on this statute.

§ 2737.
Officer’s return.

The officer serving the execution shall make return thereof with his or her doings thereon, describing the goods or chattels taken and sold and the sum for which each was sold.

§ 2738.
Action against officer for fraud or collusion.

When such officer is guilty of fraud or collusion on such sale or return, he or she shall pay the party injured three times the amount of damages occasioned by such fraud or collusion, to be recovered in an action of tort on this statute, with costs.

§ 2739.
United States currency.

United States currency may be taken in execution and paid to the creditor as money collected.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 73, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 2740.
Goods and chattels; exemptions from.

The goods or chattels of a debtor may be taken and sold on execution, except the following articles, which shall be exempt from attachment and execution, unless turned out to the officer to be taken on the attachment or execution, by the debtor:

the debtor’s interest, not to exceed $2,500.00 in aggregate value, in a motor vehicle or motor vehicles;

the debtor’s interest, not to exceed $5,000.00 in aggregate value, in professional or trade books or tools of the profession or trade of the debtor or a dependent of the debtor;

a wedding ring;

the debtor’s interest, not to exceed $500.00 in aggregate value, in other jewelry held primarily for the personal, family, or household use of the debtor or a dependent of the debtor;

the debtor’s interest, not to exceed $2,500.00 in aggregate value, in household furnishings, goods or appliances, books, wearing apparel, animals, crops, or musical instruments that are held primarily for the personal, family, or household use of the debtor or a dependent of the debtor;

growing crops, not to exceed $5,000.00 in aggregate value;

the debtor’s aggregate interest in any property, not to exceed $400.00 in value, plus up to $7,000.00 of any unused amount of the exemptions provided under subdivisions (1), (2), (4), (5) and (6) of this section;

one cooking stove, appliances needed for heating, one refrigerator, one freezer, one water heater, sewing machines;

ten cords of firewood, five tons of coals, or 500 gallons of oil;

500 gallons of bottled gas;

one cow, two goats, 10 sheep, 10 chickens, and feed sufficient to keep the cow, goats, sheep, or chickens through one winter;

three swarms of bees and their hives with their produce in honey;

one yoke of oxen or steers or two horses kept and used for team work;

two harnesses, two halters, two chains, one plow, and one ox yoke;

the debtor’s interest, not to exceed $700.00 in value, in bank deposits or deposit accounts of the debtor;

the debtor’s interest in self-directed retirement accounts of the debtor, including all pensions, all proceeds of and payments under annuity policies or plans, all individual retirement accounts, all Keogh plans, all simplified employee pension plans, and all other plans qualified under sections 401, 403, 408, 408A or 457 of the Internal Revenue Code. However, an individual retirement account, Keogh plan, simplified employee pension plan, or other qualified plan, except a Roth IRA, is only exempt to the extent that contributions thereto were deductible or excludable from federal income taxation at the time of contribution, plus interest, dividends, or other earnings that have accrued on those contributions, plus any growth in value of the assets held in the plan or account and acquired with those contributions. A Roth IRA is exempt to the extent that contributions thereto did not exceed the contribution limits set forth in section 408A of the Internal Revenue Code, plus interest, dividends, or other earnings on the Roth IRA from such contributions, plus any growth in value of the assets held in the Roth IRA acquired with those contributions. No contribution to a self-directed plan or account shall be exempt if made less than one calendar year from the date of filing for bankruptcy, whether voluntarily or involuntarily. Exemptions under this subdivision shall not exceed $5,000.00 for the purpose of attachment of assets by the office of child support pursuant to

15 V.S.A. § 799

;

professionally prescribed health aids for the debtor or a dependent of the debtor;

any unmatured life insurance contract owned by the debtor, other than a credit life insurance contract;

property traceable to or the debtor’s right to receive, to the extent reasonably necessary for the support of the debtor and any dependents of the debtor:

Social Security benefits;

veteran’s benefits;

disability or illness benefits;

alimony, support, or separate maintenance;

compensation awarded under a crime victim’s reparation law;

compensation for personal bodily injury, pain and suffering, or actual pecuniary loss of the debtor or an individual on whom the debtor is dependent;

compensation for the wrongful death of an individual on whom the debtor was dependent;

payment under a life insurance contract that insured the life of an individual on whom the debtor was dependent on the date of that individual’s death;

compensation for loss of future earnings of the debtor or an individual on whom the debtor was or is dependent;

payments under a pension, annuity, profit-sharing, stock bonus, or similar plan or contract on account of death, disability, illness, or retirement from or termination of employment.

HISTORY:

Amended

1987, No. 233

(Adj. Sess.);

1999, No. 12

, § 1;

2001, No. 13

, § 1.

§ 2741.
Repealed. 1979, No. 67, § 9, eff. date, see note set out below.

§ 2742.
Security by creditor in case of doubt as to ownership or liability of chattels to attachment or execution.

When there is reasonable doubt as to the ownership of the goods or chattels or as to their liability to be taken on a writ of attachment or execution, the officer may require sufficient security to indemnify him or her for taking the same.
If the creditor, his or her agent or attorney does not, within a reasonable time after the request, give the security to the officer, he or she may release them to the person from whom they were taken, at any time before the sale of the goods or chattels, and may take other goods or chattels, or, when permitted under section 2741 of this title, the body of the debtor, and for want thereof may return a non est inventus.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 75, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 2743.
Executions against municipal corporations—To issue against goods or chattels of inhabitants.

When judgment is rendered against a county, town, village, school, or fire district, execution shall issue against the goods or chattels of the inhabitants of such county, town, village, school, or fire district, and may be levied and collected of the same.

§ 2744.
Demand; payment from municipal funds.

The officer who receives any such execution shall forthwith demand the amount thereof of the treasurer of the county, town, village, or district.
Such treasurer shall pay the same with charges, if there are sufficient monies in his or her hands belonging to such county, town, village, or district.

§ 2745.
Levy when not paid.

If the execution or a part thereof remains unpaid, at the expiration of 12 days after making such demand, and not sooner, the officer shall levy and collect the same as therein directed.

§ 2746.
Payment by inhabitant whose property is taken.

An inhabitant whose goods or chattels are taken on such execution, may pay to the officer the amount of such execution and the charges thereon before their sale.

§ 2747.
Recovery against municipality.

Such inhabitant shall be entitled to recover against the county, town, village, or district, the sum so paid or levied on his or her goods or chattels, with 12 percent interest thereon, in an action of contract on this statute.